Utah statutes.
48-2c-206.   Powers of the division.

The division and the division director shall have the powers and authority reasonably necessary to interpret and administer the provisions of this chapter applicable to them and to perform the duties required of the division and the division director under this chapter.



Enacted by Chapter 260, 2001 General Session

